Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 1

General Provisions

69-1-101. Navigable waters are highways.

All navigable waters are public highways, including those declared navigable by special law.

Code 1858, § 1299; Shan., § 1808; Code 1932, § 3074; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-101.

Law Reviews.

Water Rights in Tennessee (Mahlon L. Townsend), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 557.

Attorney General Opinions. This section does not provide the commissioner with investigative authority under the Tennessee Water Quality Control Act, OAG 04-035, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 35 (3/09/04).

Determination of navigability and ownership of land beneath a river. OAG 11-75, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 77 (10/21/11).

69-1-102. Opening and cleaning navigable streams.

The county legislative body is authorized to make contracts for opening or cleaning out any navigable streams within the county, and for keeping them free from obstructions.

Code 1858, § 1300 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 1); Shan., § 1809; Code 1932, § 3075; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-102.

Cross-References. County legislative body may permit or remove improvements, §69-1-111.

69-1-103. Overseers appointed for navigable stream districts.

A county may lay off a navigable stream or any portion of the stream in the county into a district, and appoint overseers to the district, as in the case of public roads.

Code 1858, § 1301 (deriv. Acts 1784 (Oct.), ch. 14, § 16); Shan., § 1810; Code 1932, § 3076; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-103.

69-1-104. Working on streams as public roads.

When any watercourse is laid off into districts, hands shall be apportioned, the necessary instruments furnished, and the watercourse cleared out, obstructions removed, and the stream kept in good order by the overseer, under the same regulations and penalties in regard to overseers and hands as in the case of public roads.

Code 1858, § 1302 (deriv. Acts 1784 (Oct.), ch. 14, § 16); Shan., § 1811; Code 1932, § 3077; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-104.

69-1-105. Supervisor of water improvements — Duties.

Every county legislative body may appoint a supervisor to visit the improvements made on the navigable streams in the county, at least once in every year, and make diligent inquiry into all offenses committed in regard to the streams, and institute proceedings against such offenses.

Code 1858, § 1303; Shan., § 1812; Code 1932, § 3078; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-105.

69-1-106. Compensation of supervisor.

The county legislative body shall allow the supervisor a reasonable compensation for services, to be paid out of any money in the county treasury.

Code 1858, § 1304; Shan., § 1813; Code 1932, § 3079; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-106.

69-1-107. Obstructing river — Penalty.

Any person who obstructs the navigation of the main channel of any navigable river or other stream, by building mills, erecting dams or locks, in or across the same, unless authorized by law, or by any other means whatever, shall be liable to a penalty of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), one half (½) to the use of the person who sues for it and the other one half (½) to the use of the state.

In addition to the civil penalty in subsection (a), such obstruction of the main channel of any navigable river or other stream is a Class C misdemeanor.

Code 1858, § 1305 (deriv. Acts 1819, ch. 63, § 4); Shan., § 1814; Code 1932, § 3080; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-107; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Navigable stream, obstruction of not to be permitted by courts, §54-13-102.

Navigation not to be interrupted, §69-1-111.

Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Penalty for obstruction of navigability permitting requirements, §69-1-117.

Vandalism, §39-14-408.

69-1-108. Diverting water from main channel.

No person, upon pretense of having a right to the flow of water through a sluice of a navigable watercourse, on which sluice such person has built a mill, shall divert the water from the main channel into the sluice, so as to obstruct or impede the navigation of the main channel.

A violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Code 1858, § 1306; Shan., § 1816; Code 1932, § 3082; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-108; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class C misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Vandalism, §39-14-408.

Law Reviews.

The Movement for New Water Rights Laws in the Tennessee Valley States (Robert H. Marquis, Richard M. Freeman and Milton S. Heath, Jr.), 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 797.

69-1-109. Temporary diversion from sluice.

The water of the sluice may be diverted into the main channel for the immediate passage of a boat for a time not exceeding one half (½) a day, so that the water is returned to the sluice in such manner as not to impair the profitable enjoyment of the mill.

Code 1858, § 1307; Shan., § 1817; Code 1932, § 3083; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-109.

69-1-110. Damages for diversion of stream.

Any person diverting any stream from its natural channel is liable to any party aggrieved for the damages sustained.

Code 1858, § 1308; Shan., § 1818; Code 1932, § 3084; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-110.

69-1-111. County may permit or remove improvements.

The county legislative body may authorize milldams, fish traps, and other local improvements and erections in watercourses in the county, and fix the rates of toll or charge, under the limitations, restrictions, and conditions deemed proper, and remove them when the public interests require.

The application for any of these purposes shall be by petition, in writing, stating the nature and object of the proposed improvement or erection, notice of which shall be given as prescribed in the case of toll bridges, ferries, and causeways.

The county legislative body shall be satisfied that the preliminary notice has been given before acting on the application, and may then decree as the public interests seem to require.

No milldam, fish trap, bridge, or other improvement shall be allowed so as to interrupt or in any way injure or impair the navigation of any navigable watercourse of the state.

Code 1858, §§ 1309-1312 (deriv. Acts 1835-1836, ch. 29, § 1); Shan., §§ 1819-1822; Code 1932, §§ 3085-3088; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-111 — 70-114.

Cross-References. Navigable streams, improvements permitted by courts not to obstruct, §54-13-102.

Obstructing waterway, §39-17-307.

69-1-112. Commissioners of watercourses.

The county legislative body may, as often as necessary, appoint commissioners to:

Examine the watercourses in the county, to see that the local erections allowed in the watercourses are conformable to law, and that one fourth (¼) of such watercourses, including the deepest portions, are left open for the free passage of fish;

Lay off slopes of dams when necessary, determining the time they shall be left open; and

Return a plan of the stream, and the falls, dams, and other erections on the stream, when deemed necessary.

Code 1858, § 1314 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 15, § 1; Shan., § 1826; Code 1932, § 3090; T.C.A., (orig. ed.), § 70-115.

Cross-References. Supervisor of water improvements — Duties and compensation, §§69-1-105,69-1-106.

69-1-113. Forfeiture for obstructing stream.

Any person who obstructs for twenty-four (24) hours, in any way, that part of the stream directed to be left open, or fails to open slopes as the commissioners may judge necessary, forfeits twenty dollars ($20.00), one half (½) to go to the county, and the other one half (½) to any person suing for it.

Code 1858, § 1315 (deriv. Acts 1787, ch. 15, § 2); Shan., § 1827; Code 1932, § 3091; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-116.

Law Reviews.

The Movement for New Water Rights Laws in the Tennessee Valley States (Robert H. Marquis, Richard M. Freeman and Milton S. Heath, Jr.), 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 797.

69-1-114. Railroad drawbridges — Operation.

Railroad companies in this state whose roads cross navigable watercourses in this state shall, upon signal being given by any steamboat for the opening of the draw of any railroad bridge, proceed immediately to open the draw and make ready for the passage of the boat; and as soon as the draw is open and ready, if in the nighttime, they shall hoist a large red light, not less than eight inches (8") in diameter, at least ten feet (10') above the tops of the gallows frame or gallow bitts of the draw; and they shall keep one (1) white light on each end of the draw as a signal that all is ready; and the light shall remain stationary until after the boat has passed.

Any railroad company failing so to do shall forfeit for each and every such failure the sum of one hundred dollars ($100), to be recovered before any court of competent jurisdiction, one half (½) to go to the informer, and the other one half (½) to the common school fund of the state.

Acts 1869-1870, ch. 89, §§ 1, 2; Shan., §§ 1828, 1829; Code 1932, §§ 3092, 3093; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-117, 70-118.

69-1-115. Damages caused by canalizing rivers.

Counties lying contiguous to or bordering upon any navigable river or rivers that are improved and canalized by the United States government, by the construction and maintenance of locks and dams so as to render such river or rivers navigable to boats of ordinary tonnage, are empowered through their respective county legislative bodies to assume, provide for and pay any and all actual damages caused, or that may be occasioned by the construction and maintenance of such locks and dams to the contiguous land or lands.

For the payment of the respective owners of damage from overflow to their lands as authorized and provided in this section by the respective county legislative bodies of the counties in which such overflow causing the damage may exist, the respective county legislative bodies are empowered to pay such damages out of any moneys of the county not otherwise appropriated, or may levy a special tax for the damages upon the property and taxables in such county. Such damages may be assessed in the manner now authorized by law in condemnation cases of real estate.

Acts 1919, ch. 190, §§ 1, 2; Shan. Supp., §§ 1880a33, 1880a34; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3168, 3169; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 70-119, 70-120.

Cross-References. Execution on real property, §16-15-804.

69-1-116. Eleemosynary institutions — Access to water.

Orphan asylums, houses for destitute children, reformatory institutions, industrial schools, asylums for the insane, homes for confederate or federal soldiers, national homes for disabled volunteer soldiers, and all eleemosynary institutions of like class chartered or incorporated under the laws of the state of Tennessee, or of the United States congress, dependent for support upon the public, have the right to acquire, by purchase or donation, springs of water, flowing streams, and water rights of lower riparian owners; and, further, the right and power to acquire, by purchase, donation, or condemnation, the riparian rights of lower owners of land through which flows the water of springs so purchased or donated, to the flow of water from the springs, rights-of-way through the lands of intervening property owners, when necessary for the purpose of conveying water by means of pipes and conductors, and suitable site or sites for pumping stations and reservoirs, all so as to procure a sufficient supply of potable and wholesome water for such institutions.

Acts 1903, ch. 289, § 1; Shan., § 1880a28; mod. Code 1932, § 3164; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 70-121.

69-1-117. Impairing or obstructing navigability of watercourses — Permits.

Without a permit issued by the department of environment and conservation, no person shall authorize, undertake, or engage in any activity, practice, or project that has or is likely to have the effect of impairing or obstructing the navigability of any river, lake, stream or watercourse located within the state. The navigability of any river, lake, stream or watercourse shall be limited to those adjudicated and held to be navigable in the technical or legal sense pursuant to this part. Further, any river, lake, stream or watercourse subject to the Rivers and Harbors Act (33 U.S.C. § 401 et seq.), shall be exempt from the permit requirements of this section.

Consistent with state common law and statutory law on navigability, the commissioner of environment and conservation shall promulgate rules, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to establish and implement the permitting system required by subsection (a). Such rules shall establish procedures for obtaining such permits and shall delineate the circumstances, conditions, and limitations under which such permits may be issued. No permit shall be issued for any activity, practice, or project that would violate state common law or statutory law on the navigability of rivers, lakes, streams, and watercourses.

The department shall investigate each reported, suspected, or observed violation of subsection (a), as well as each reported, suspected, or observed violation of state navigability law. Whenever a violation is found to exist, the department shall undertake appropriate administrative and legal measures to cause the violation to cease.

A violation of subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor. A violation that continues into a successive day is regarded as a separate offense.

Acts 1986, ch. 818, § 1; 1989, ch. 591, § 1; 1992, ch. 693, § 1.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Water Law, You Never Miss the Water Till the Well Runs Dry (Vincent A. Sikora), 24 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1988).

Attorney General Opinions. Regulation of Reelfoot Lake waterfowl blinds by wildlife agencies, OAG 98-007, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 7 (1/9/98).